Utah statutes.
13-42-134.   Suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of registration.
(1)  In this section, "insolvent" means:
(a)  having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business
other than as a result of good-faith dispute;
(b)  being unable to pay debts as they become due; or
(c)  being insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy law, 11
U.S.C. Section 101 et seq.
(2)  The administrator may suspend, revoke, or deny renewal of a provider's
registration if:
(a)  a fact or condition exists that, if it had existed when the registrant
applied for registration as a provider, would have been a reason for denying
registration;
(b)  the provider has committed a material violation of this chapter or a rule
or order of the administrator under this chapter;
(c)  the provider is insolvent;
(d)  the provider or an employee or affiliate of the provider has refused to
permit the administrator to make an examination authorized by this chapter,
failed to comply with Subsection 13-42-132(2)(b) within 15 days after request,
or made a material misrepresentation or omission in complying with Subsection
13-42-132(2)(b); or
(e)  the provider has not responded within a reasonable time and in an
appropriate manner to communications from the administrator.
(3)  If a provider does not comply with Subsection 13-42-122(6) or if the
administrator otherwise finds that the public health or safety or general
welfare requires emergency action, the administrator may order a summary
suspension of the provider's registration, effective on the date specified in
the order.
(4)  If the administrator suspends, revokes, or denies renewal of the
registration of a provider, the administrator may seek a court order
authorizing seizure of any or all of the money in a trust account required by
Section 13-42-122, books, records, accounts, and other property of the
provider which are located in this state.
(5)  If the administrator suspends or revokes a provider's registration, the
provider may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act.
